src/morphology/stems/prepostpos.lexc
LEXICON PoGen
 +Po+SC/Gen: GI; 
 GI;

LEXICON PoNom
 +Po+SC/Nom: GI; 
 GI;

LEXICON PoPar
 +Po+SC/Par: GI; 
 GI;

LEXICON PoEla
 +Po+SC/Ela: GI; 
 GI;

LEXICON PoAll
 +Po+SC/All: GI; 
 GI;

LEXICON PoAbl
 +Po+SC/Abl: GI; 
 GI;

LEXICON PoAde
 +Po+SC/Ade: GI; ! pool
 GI;

LEXICON PoCom
 +Po+SC/Com: GI; 
 GI;

!LEXICON PoAbe
! +Po+SC/Abe: GI; 
! GI;

LEXICON PrGen
 +Pr+SC/Gen: GI; 
 GI;

!LEXICON PrNom
! +Pr+SC/Nom: GI; 
! GI;

LEXICON PrPar
 +Pr+SC/Par: GI; 
 GI;

LEXICON PrEla
 +Pr+SC/Ela: GI; 
 GI;

LEXICON PrAll
 +Pr+SC/All: GI; 
 GI;

!LEXICON PrAbl
! +Pr+SC/Abl: GI; 
! GI;

!LEXICON PrAde
! +Pr+SC/Ade: GI; 
! GI;

LEXICON PrCom
 +Pr+SC/Com: GI; 
 GI;

LEXICON PrAbe
 +Pr+SC/Abe: GI; 
 GI;

LEXICON PrTrm
 +Pr+SC/Trm: GI; 
 GI;


LEXICON PoPrGen
 PoGen;
 PrGen;

LEXICON PoPrPar
 PoPar;
 PrPar;

LEXICON PoPrEla
 PoEla;
 PrEla;

LEXICON PoPrAll
 PoAll;
 PrAll;

LEXICON PoPrCom
 PoCom;
 PrCom;


LEXICON PoGenPar
 PoGen;
 PoPar;

LEXICON PoGenNom
 PoGen;
 PoNom;

LEXICON PoNomPar
 PoNom;
 PoPar;

LEXICON PoGenPrPar
 PoGen;
 PrPar;

LEXICON PoGenAde
 PoGen;
 PoAde;

LEXICON PoGenAbl
 PoGen;
 PoAbl;

LEXICON PoGenPoPrEla
 PoGen;
 PoPrEla;

LEXICON PoGenPrGenPar
 PoGen;
 PrGen;
 PrPar;

LEXICON PoGenElaPrGenPar
 PoGen;
 PoEla;
 PrGen;
 PrPar;

LEXICON PoGenNomElaPrGen
 PoGen;
 PoNom;
 PoEla;
 PrGen;

LEXICON PrePostPositions
 aegu+Adp:aegu PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 ajel+Adp:ajel PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 alates+Adp:alates PoGenPoPrEla; ! (41_KD -> +Adv +K) 
 algule+Adp:algule PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 algult+Adp:algult PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 alla+Adp:alla PoGenPrGenPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 allapoole+Adp:alla#poole PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 allpool+Adp:all#pool PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 altpoolt+Adp:alt#poolt PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 all+Adp:all PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 alutsi+Adp:alutsi PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 arvel+Adp:arvel PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 asemele+Adp:asemele PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 asemelt+Adp:asemelt PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 edasi+Adp:edasi PoNomPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 eel+Adp:eel PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 eest+Adp:eest PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 enne+Adp:enne PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 ettepoole+Adp:ette#poole PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 eespool+Adp:ees#pool PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 eestpoolt+Adp:eest#poolt PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 haaval+Adp:haaval PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 heaks+Adp:heaks PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 hommikupoole+Adp:hommiku#poole PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 hoolimata+Adp:hoolimata PoPrEla; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 hulgast+Adp:hulgast PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 ilma+Adp:ilma PrAbe; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 jaoks+Adp:jaoks PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 juhti+Adp:juhti PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 juures+Adp:juures PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 jõul+Adp:jõul PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 järel+Adp:järel PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 järgi+Adp:järgi PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 kaasas+Adp:kaasas PoCom; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 kaelas+Adp:kaelas PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 kallale+Adp:kallale PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 kallalt+Adp:kallalt PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 kandis+Adp:kandis PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 kannule+Adp:kannule PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 kannult+Adp:kannult PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 kaudu+Adp:kaudu PoGenPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 kaupa+Adp:kaupa PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 keset+Adp:keset PrPar; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 keskel+Adp:keskel PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 keskis+Adp:keskis PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 kesk+Adp:kesk PrPar; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 kilda+Adp:kilda PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 killast+Adp:killast PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 kiuste+Adp:kiuste PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 kohal+Adp:kohal PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 kohta+Adp:kohta PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 koos+Adp:koos PoPrCom; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 korral+Adp:korral PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 kujul+Adp:kujul PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 kuni+Adp:kuni PrTrm; ! (41_JK -> +J +K) 
 kõrvale+Adp:kõrvale PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 kõrvalt+Adp:kõrvalt PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 käest+Adp:käest PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 kätte+Adp:kätte PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 küljes+Adp:küljes PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 küüsi+Adp:küüsi PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 küüsist+Adp:küüsist PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 ligidal+Adp:ligidal PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 ligi+Adp:ligi PoGenPrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 läbi+Adp:läbi PoGenNomElaPrGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 lähedale+Adp:lähedale PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 lähedalt+Adp:lähedalt PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 lähistel+Adp:lähistel PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 man+Adp:man PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 manu+Adp:manu PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 moel+Adp:moel PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 mõjul+Adp:mõjul PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 mööda+Adp:mööda PoPrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 nahka+Adp:nahka PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 najale+Adp:najale PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 najalt+Adp:najalt PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 nõjal+Adp:nõjal PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 ootel+Adp:ootel PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 otsa+Adp:otsa PoGenNom; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 otsas+Adp:otsas PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 paiku+Adp:paiku PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 peale+Adp:peale PoGenElaPrGenPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 pealt+Adp:pealt PoPrGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 pealepoole+Adp:peale#poole PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 pealpool+Adp:peal#pool PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 pealtpoolt+Adp:pealt#poolt PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 peast+Adp:peast PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 pidi+Adp:pidi PoPar; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 pihta+Adp:pihta PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 piki+Adp:piki PrPar; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 pikku+Adp:pikku PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 pinnal+Adp:pinnal PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 poole+Adp:poole PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 pool+Adp:pool PoGenAde; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 poolt+Adp:poolt PoGenAbl; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 puhul+Adp:puhul PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 pähe+Adp:pähe PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 päras+Adp:päras PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 pärast+Adp:pärast PoGenPrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 pääl+Adp:pääl PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 raames+Adp:raames PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 ringi+Adp:ringi PoNom; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 saadik+Adp:saadik PoEla; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 saatel+Adp:saatel PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 saati+Adp:saati PoEla; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 sealpool+Adp:seal#pool PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 sealtpoolt+Adp:sealt#poolt PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 seast+Adp:seast PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 seest+Adp:seest PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 seespool+Adp:sees#pool PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 seestpoolt+Adp:seest#poolt PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 seltsi+Adp:seltsi PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 seltsist+Adp:seltsist PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 seoses+Adp:seoses PoPrCom; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 siiapoole+Adp:siia#poole PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 siinpool+Adp:siin#pool PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 siitpoolt+Adp:siit#poolt PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 sinnapoole+Adp:sinna#poole PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 sissepoole+Adp:sisse#poole PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 suhtes+Adp:suhtes PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 suunas+Adp:suunas PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 suunda+Adp:suunda PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 tagant+Adp:tagant PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 tagantpoolt+Adp:tagant#poolt PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 tagapool+Adp:taga#pool PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 tagasi+Adp:tagasi PoNomPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 taha+Adp:taha PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 tahapoole+Adp:taha#poole PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 tarvis+Adp:tarvis PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 teispool+Adp:teis#pool PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 teispoole+Adp:teis#poole PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 teispoolt+Adp:teis#poolt PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 toel+Adp:toel PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 tõukel+Adp:tõukel PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 tänu+Adp:tänu PrAll; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 tükkis+Adp:tükkis PoPrCom; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 vaatamata+Adp:vaatamata PoPrAll; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 vahele+Adp:vahele PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 vahelt+Adp:vahelt PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 valgele+Adp:valgele PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 varale+Adp:varale PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 varju+Adp:varju PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 varjust+Adp:varjust PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 vastas+Adp:vastas PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 vastu+Adp:vastu PoGenPrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 veerde+Adp:veerde PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 veerest+Adp:veerest PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 viisil+Adp:viisil PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 võrra+Adp:võrra PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 väel+Adp:väel PoGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 väljapoole+Adp:välja#poole PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 väljaspool+Adp:väljas#pool PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 väljastpoolt+Adp:väljast#poolt PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 õhtupoole+Adp:õhtu#poole PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 õlule+Adp:õlule PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 ääres+Adp:ääres PoGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
 ühelepoole+Adp:ühele#poole PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 ühelpool+Adp:ühel#pool PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 üheltpoolt+Adp:ühelt#poolt PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 ühes+Adp:ühes PoPrCom; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 ülalpool+Adp:ülal#pool PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 ülaltpoolt+Adp:ülalt#poolt PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 üle+Adp:üle PoPrGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 ülespoole+Adp:üles#poole PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 ülevalpool+Adp:üleval#pool PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 ülevaltpoolt+Adp:ülevalt#poolt PrPar; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 ümber+Adp:ümber PoPrGen; ! (41_DK -> +Adv +K) 
 ümbert+Adp:ümbert PoPrGen; ! (41_K -> +K) 
